Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1583
Regional housing agency; name.

Each regional housing agency established pursuant to the Nebraska Housing Agency Act shall adopt, within or together with the resolution or ordinance required under section 71-1581, a name for all legal and operating purposes. The name so adopted shall include a reference to the geographic locus of the agency and such other name or identifier as the governing bodies establishing the agency shall determine. A regional housing agency established under prior law may adopt a name consistent with this section by resolution or ordinance adopted by at least two-thirds of such agency's entire board of commissioners and approved by the governing bodies of all political subdivisions establishing such agency.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 12.